Montana, session 2025, SB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 19-6-501, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-6-501. Eligibility for service retirement benefit. (1) (a) Subject to a member's right to a refund
of the member's accumulated contributions under Title 19, chapter 2, part 6, a member hired on or before June
30, 2023, is eligible to receive a nonforfeitable service retirement benefit under 19-6-502 after completing 20
years or more of membership service and terminating service.
(b) Subject to a member's right to a refund of the member's accumulated contributions under Title
19, chapter 2, part 6, a member hired on or after July 1, 2023, is eligible to receive a nonforfeitable service
retirement benefit under 19-6-502 after completing 20 years or more of membership service, reaching the age
of 50, and terminating service.
(2) For the purposes of compliance with section 411 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 411,
a vested member is treated as having who has either reached age 50 or completed 20 years of membership
service, whichever occurs later, has attained normal retirement age and has a nonforfeitable right to the
member's service retirement."
Section 2. Section 19-7-501, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-7-501. Eligibility for service retirement benefit. (1) (a) Subject to a member's right to a refund
of the member's accumulated contributions under Title 19, chapter 2, part 6, a member hired on or before June
30, 2023, who has completed at least 20 years of membership service is eligible for a nonforfeitable service
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 7
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 7
retirement benefit under 19-7-503.
(b) Subject to a member's right to a refund of the member's accumulated contributions under Title
19, chapter 2, part 6, a member hired on or after July 1, 2023, who has completed at least 20 years of
membership service and reached 50 years of age is eligible for a nonforfeitable service retirement benefit under
19-7-503.
(2) For the purposes of compliance with section 411 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 411,
a vested member described in subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) is treated as having attained normal retirement age
and who has either reached age 50 or completed 20 years of membership service, whichever occurs later, has
attained normal retirement age and has a nonforfeitable right to the member's service retirement."
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
Section 4. Retroactive applicability. [This act] applies retroactively, within the meaning of 1-2-109,
to members of the highway patrol officers' retirement system and the sheriffs' retirement system hired on or
after July 1, 2023.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 7
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 7, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 7
INTRODUCED BY W. MCKAMEY
BY REQUEST OF THE STATE ADMINISTRATION AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS INTERIM COMMITTEE
AN ACT REVISING THE RETIREMENT CRITERIA FOR THE HIGHWAY PATROL OFFICERS' RETIREMENT
SYSTEM AND THE SHERIFFS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM; AMENDING SECTIONS 19-6-501 AND 19-7-501,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE AND A RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY DATE.”